New Jersey, session 222, A266.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  No person may sell, distribute, or use urea as an ice melt in the State. b.    No other uses of urea are prohibited by this act. c.     Any person who violates subsection a. or b. of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $500 for the first offense and up to $1,000 for the second and each subsequent offense, to be collected in a civil action by summary proceeding under the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  If the violation is of a continuing nature, each day during which it continues shall constitute an additional, separate and distinct offense. The Superior Court and the municipal court, as appropriate, shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999" pursuant to this subsection. d.    The provisions of this act may be enforced by the Department of Environmental Protection, or by any municipality, county, or local health agency. e.     For the purposes of this section: Ice melt means a substance applied to an outdoor surface for the purpose of melting or removing ice or snow, or as a preventative measure against the formation of ice. Urea means the nitrogen-producing substance and commercially produced products often used as fertilizer, but also used to melt, prevent the formation of, or remove ice. Urea may include, but is not limited to, ammonia sulfates used to melt, prevent the formation of, or remove ice, but urea shall not include rock salt. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.